Illinois, session 104th, SB1998.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Antitrust Act is amended by 5changing Section 7.2a as follows: 6    (740 ILCS 10/7.2a)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2027)8    Sec. 7.2a. Notification to the Attorney General.9    (a) As used in this Section:10    "Acquisition" means an agreement, arrangement, or activity 11the consummation of which results in a person acquiring 12directly or indirectly the control of another person. 13"Acquisition" includes the acquisition of voting securities 14and noncorporate interests, such as assets, capital stock, 15membership interests, or equity interests.16    "Contracting affiliation" means the formation of a 17relationship between 2 or more entities that permits the 18entities to negotiate jointly with health carriers or 19third-party administrators over rates for professional medical 20services, or for one entity to negotiate on behalf of the other 21entity with health carriers or third-party administrators over 22rates for professional medical services. "Contracting 23affiliation" does not include arrangements among entities   SB1998- 2 -LRB104 09783 JRC 19849 b1under common ownership.2    "Covered transaction" means any merger, acquisition, or 3contracting affiliation between 2 or more health care 4facilities or provider organizations not previously under 5common ownership or contracting affiliation.6    "Health care facility" means the following facilities, 7organizations, and related persons:8        (1) An ambulatory surgical treatment center required 9    to be licensed under the Ambulatory Surgical Treatment 10    Center Act.11        (2) An institution, place, building, or agency 12    required to be licensed under the Hospital Licensing Act.13        (3) A hospital, ambulatory surgical treatment center, 14    or kidney disease treatment center maintained by the State 15    or any department or agency thereof.16        (4) A kidney disease treatment center, including a 17    free-standing hemodialysis unit required to meet the 18    requirements of 42 CFR 494 in order to be certified for 19    participation in Medicare and Medicaid under Titles XVIII 20    and XIX of the federal Social Security Act of 1935.21        (5) An institution, place, building, or room used for 22    the performance of outpatient surgical procedures that is 23    leased, owned, or operated by or on behalf of an 24    out-of-state facility.25        (6) An institution, place, building, or room used for 26    provision of a health care category of service, as defined   SB1998- 3 -LRB104 09783 JRC 19849 b1    under the Illinois Health Facilities Planning Act, 2    including, but not limited to, cardiac catheterization and 3    open heart surgery.4    With the exception of those health care facilities 5specifically included in this Section, nothing in this Section 6shall be intended to include facilities operated as a part of 7the practice of a physician or other licensed health care 8professional, whether practicing in his or her individual 9capacity or within the legal structure of any partnership, 10medical or professional corporation, or unincorporated medical 11or professional group. Further, this Section shall not apply 12to physicians or other licensed health care professional's 13practices where such practices are carried out in a portion of 14a health care facility under contract with such health care 15facility by a physician or by other licensed health care 16professionals, whether practicing in his or her individual 17capacity or within the legal structure of any partnership, 18medical or professional corporation, or unincorporated medical 19or professional groups, unless the entity constructs, 20modifies, or establishes a health care facility as 21specifically defined in this Section.22    "Health care services revenue" means the total revenue 23received for health care services in the previous 12 months.24    "Health carriers" has the meaning given to that term in 25Section 10 of the Health Carrier External Review Act.26    "Hedge fund" means a pool of funds managed by investors   SB1998- 4 -LRB104 09783 JRC 19849 b1for the purpose of earning a return on those funds, regardless 2of the strategies used to manage the funds. "Hedge fund" 3includes, but is not limited to, a pool of funds managed or 4controlled by private limited partnerships. "Hedge fund" does 5not include:6        (1) Natural persons or other entities that contribute, 7    or promise to contribute, funds to the hedge fund, but 8    otherwise do not participate in the management of the 9    hedge fund or the fund's assets, or in any change in 10    control of the hedge fund or the fund's assets.11        (2) Entities that solely provide or manage debt 12    financing secured in whole or in part by the assets of a 13    health care facility, including, but not limited to, banks 14    and credit unions, commercial real estate lenders, bond 15    underwriters, and trustees.16    "Illinois health care entity" means a health care facility 17or provider organization that has an office in or is doing 18business in this State.19    "Merger" means the consolidation of 2 or more 20organizations, including 2 or more organizations joining 21through a common parent organization or 2 or more 22organizations forming a new organization, but does not include 23a corporate reorganization.24    "Out-of-state health care entity" means a health care 25facility or provider organization that is not headquartered in 26this State and does not do business in this State.  SB1998- 5 -LRB104 09783 JRC 19849 b1    "Private equity group" means an investor or group of 2investors who primarily engage in the raising or returning of 3capital and who invests, develops, or disposes of specified 4assets. "Private equity group" does not include natural 5persons or other entities that contribute or promise to 6contribute funds to the private equity group, but otherwise do 7not participate in the management of the private equity group 8or the group's assets, or in any change in control of the 9private equity group or the group's assets manner, including, 10but not limited to, lease, transfer, exchange, option, receipt 11of a conveyance, creation of a joint venture, or any other 12manner of purchase, by a private equity group or hedge fund of 13a material amount of the assets or operations, or a change of 14control, of a health care facility in this State.15    "Provider organization" means a corporation, partnership, 16business trust, association, or organized group of persons, 17whether incorporated or not, which is in the business of 18health care delivery or management and that represents 20 or 19more health care providers in contracting with health carriers 20or third-party administrators for the payment of health care 21services. "Provider organization" includes physician 22organizations, physician-hospital organizations, independent 23practice associations, provider networks, and accountable care 24organizations.25    "Third-party administrator" means an entity that 26administers payments for health care services on behalf of a   SB1998- 6 -LRB104 09783 JRC 19849 b1client in exchange for an administrative fee.2    (b) Health care facilities or provider organizations that 3are party to a covered transaction shall provide notice of 4such transaction to the Attorney General no later than 30 days 5prior to the transaction closing or effective date of the 6transaction.7    Covered transactions between an Illinois health care 8entity and an out-of-state health care entity must provide 9notice under this subsection where the out-of-state entity 10generates $10,000,000 or more in annual revenue from patients 11residing in this State.12    (c) The written notice provided by the parties under 13subsection (b) shall be provided as follows:14        (1) For any health care facility or provider 15    organization that is a party to a covered transaction and 16    files a premerger notification with the Federal Trade 17    Commission or the United States Department of Justice, in 18    compliance with the Hart-Scott-Rodino Antitrust 19    Improvements Act of 1976, 15 U.S.C. 18a, the notice 20    requirement is satisfied by providing a copy of such 21    filing to the Attorney General at the same time as it is 22    provided to the federal government.23        (2) For any health care facility that is a party to a 24    covered transaction that is not described in paragraph 25    (1), the notice requirement is satisfied when the 26    healthcare facility files an application for a change of   SB1998- 7 -LRB104 09783 JRC 19849 b1    ownership with the Health Facilities and Services Review 2    Board, in compliance with the Illinois Health Facilities 3    Planning Act. The Health Facilities and Services Review 4    Board shall provide a copy of such filing to the Attorney 5    General at the same time as it is provided to the 6    applicable State legislators under subsection (a) of 7    Section 8.5 of the Illinois Health Facilities Planning 8    Act.9        (3) For any health care facility or provider 10    organization that is a party to a covered transaction that 11    is not described in paragraph (1) or (2), written notice 12    provided by the parties must include:13            (A) the names of the parties and their current 14        business address;15            (B) identification of all locations where health 16        care services are currently provided by each party;17            (C) a brief description of the nature and purpose 18        of the proposed transaction; and19            (D) the anticipated effective date of the proposed 20        transaction.21    Nothing in this subsection prohibits the parties to a 22covered transaction from voluntarily providing additional 23information to the Attorney General.24    (d) The Attorney General may make any requests for 25additional information from the parties that is relevant to 26its investigation of the covered transaction within 30 days of   SB1998- 8 -LRB104 09783 JRC 19849 b1the date notice is received under subsections (b) and (c). If 2the Attorney General requests additional information, the 3covered transaction may not proceed until 30 days after the 4parties have substantially complied with the request. Any 5subsequent request for additional information by the Attorney 6General shall not further delay the covered transaction from 7proceeding. Nothing in this Section precludes the Attorney 8General from conducting an investigation or enforcing State or 9federal antitrust laws at a later date.10    (d-1) The Attorney General must provide written consent to 11a covered transaction before it may take effect if a private 12equity group or hedge fund provides any financing to the 13covered transaction. 14    (e) Any health care facility or provider organization that 15fails to comply with any provision of this Section is subject 16to a civil penalty of not more than $500 per day for each day 17during which the health care facility or provider organization 18is in violation of this Section.19    Whenever the Attorney General has reason to believe that a 20health care facility or provider organization has engaged in 21or is engaging in a covered transaction without complying with 22the provisions of this Section, the Attorney General may apply 23for and obtain, in an action in the Circuit Court of Sangamon 24or Cook County, a temporary restraining order or injunction, 25or both, prohibiting the health care facility or provider 26organization from continuing its noncompliance or doing any   SB1998- 9 -LRB104 09783 JRC 19849 b1act in furtherance thereof. The court may make such further 2orders or judgments, at law or in equity, as may be necessary 3to remedy such noncompliance.4    Before bringing such an action or seeking to recover a 5civil penalty, the Attorney General shall permit the health 6care facility or provider organization to come into compliance 7with this Section within 10 days of being notified of its 8alleged noncompliance. The right to cure noncompliance does 9not exist on or after the covered transaction's proposed or 10actual closing date of the covered transaction, whichever is 11sooner.12    (f) This Section is repealed on January 1, 2027.13(Source: P.A. 103-526, eff. 1-1-24.)